New York, session 2025-2026, A5838.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 381 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. The secretary shall require each local government having juris- 4 diction to issue building permits to provide, at no cost, pre-approved 5 construction documents in the format and quantity for each type of 6 dwelling permitted to be constructed in such jurisdiction, including 7 single family dwellings, two-to-four family dwellings, multiple dwell- 8 ings and mixed-use structures which contain residential dwellings. Each 9 such local government which issues building permits shall have on file 10 and provide construction documents for dwellings of every size, categor- 11 ized by number of bedrooms and number of floors, which are permitted to 12 be constructed in the jurisdiction of the local government and which 13 have been approved by such issuing authority. Such construction docu- 14 ments shall be sufficient for the issuance of a building permit without 15 further alteration of such documents. Provided, however, that such local 16 government, at its discretion, is not required to provide such 17 construction documents for lots, plots, blocks or sites that do not 18 have a de minimis elevation grade or are in a flood hazard area. Nothing 19 in this section shall imply that more than one authority having juris- 20 diction cannot provide the same or similar documents. 21 § 2. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended by 22 adding a new section 28-104.1.2 to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08813-02-5 A. 5838 2 1 § 28-104.1.2 Pre-approved construction documents. The department 2 shall provide, at no cost, pre-approved construction documents in the 3 format and quantity for each type of dwelling permitted to be 4 constructed in the city, including single family dwellings, two-to-four 5 family dwellings, multiple dwellings and mixed-use structures which 6 contain residential dwellings. The department shall have on file and 7 provide construction documents for dwellings of every size, categorized 8 by number of bedrooms and number of floors, which are permitted to be 9 constructed in the city which have been approved by the department. Such 10 construction documents shall be sufficient for the issuance of a build- 11 ing permit without further alteration of such documents. For multiple 12 dwellings in excess of one floor, the department may provide 13 construction documents containing the same design for each floor and the 14 maximum number of floors for the height it is zoned for. Provided, 15 however, that the department, at its discretion, is not required to 16 provide such documents for any lot that does not have a de minimis 17 elevation grade or is in a flood hazard area. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 19 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of 20 any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on 21 its effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before 22 such effective date.